Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1275
Manufacturer's or importer's certificate; required.

No manufacturer, importer, dealer, or other person shall sell or otherwise dispose of a new motorboat to a dealer to be used by such dealer for purposes of display and resale without delivering to the dealer a duly executed manufacturer's or importer's certificate with assignments on the certificate to show title in the purchaser of the motorboat and affixing to the motorboat its hull identification number if not already affixed. No dealer shall purchase or acquire a new motorboat without obtaining from the seller a manufacturer's or importer's certificate.

Laws 1994, LB 123, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 11.